fr: Profil du caoutchouc de bande: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (double densité); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (édition de tournoi); U23; Autre
vi: Hình dạng cao su đệm: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (mật độ kép); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (phiên bản du đấu); U23; Khác
ro-RO: Profil cauciuc pernă: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (densitate dublă); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Altele
sl-SI: Profil gume za robove: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dvojna gostota); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Drugo
pt-BR: Perfil de borracha de amortecimento: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dupla densidade); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (edição de torneio); U23; Outro
en: Cushion rubber profile: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dual density); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Other
ko: 쿠션 고무 프로파일: K37; K55; K55(MBS); K55(리바운드 프로); K55(이중 밀도); K66; K66(MBS); K66(투어 에디션); U23; 기타
tr: Yastık kauçuk profili: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (çift yoğunluklu); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (turnuva sürümü); U23; Diğer
hu: Párnázat gumielemének profilja: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (kettős sűrűségű); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Egyéb
pt-PT: Perfil de borracha de amortecimento: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dupla densidade); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Outro
zh-TW: 緩衝橡膠條輪廓: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (雙密度); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (巡迴賽版); U23; 其他
zh-CN: 缓冲橡胶截面: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55（双密度）; K66; K66 (MBS); K66（巡回赛版）; U23; 其他
pl: Profil gumy bandy: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (podwójna gęstość); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (wersja turniejowa); U23; Inny
ru: Профиль резины борта: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (двойной плотности); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (Tour Edition); U23; Другое
lt-LT: Pagalvėlės gumos profilis: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 („Rebound Pro“); K55 (dvigubo tankio); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (turnyrinis); U23; Kita
it: Profilo in gomma ammortizzante: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (a doppia densità); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (Tour Edition); U23; Altro
bg-BG: Профил на гумата на борда: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (с двойна плътност); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Други
hr-HR: Profil gume jastuka: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dvostruka gustoća); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (Tour Edition); U23; Ostalo
th: โปรไฟล์ยางกันกระแทก: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (ความหนาแน่นคู่); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (รุ่นทัวร์); U23; อื่นๆ
fi: Vallin kumiprofiili: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (kaksoistiheys); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (Tour Edition); U23; Muu
nl: Stootrubberprofiel: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dubbele dichtheid); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Overig
nb: Pute gummiprofil: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dobbel tetthet); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Annet
sv: Dämpad gummiprofil: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dubbel densitet); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Övrigt
ja: クッションゴムプロファイル: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (リバウンドプロ); K55 (デュアルデンシティ); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (ツアーエディション); U23; その他
el: Προφίλ ελαστικού τμήματος: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (διπλής πυκνότητας); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (έκδοση tour); U23; Άλλο
sk-SK: Gumový profil na tlmenie nárazov: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dvojitá hustota); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (Tour Edition); U23; Iné
da: Pudegummiprofil: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dobbelt densitet); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Andet
de: Profil des Bandengummis: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (Dual-Density); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (Tour Edition); U23; Sonstige
cs: Profil tlumicí gumy: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (dvojí hustota); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (tour edition); U23; Ostatní
es: Perfil de la goma de la banda: K37; K55; K55 (MBS); K55 (Rebound Pro); K55 (doble densidad); K66; K66 (MBS); K66 (edición tour); U23; Otro